Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 10. GENERAL GOVERNMENT

SUBTITLE C. STATE ACCOUNTING, FISCAL MANAGEMENT, AND PRODUCTIVITY

CHAPTER 2114. CUSTOMER SERVICE

Sec. 2114.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "state agency" means a department, commission, board, office, or other agency in the executive or judicial branch of state government that is created under the constitution or a statute of this state. The term includes an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Renumbered from Sec. 2113.001 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(70), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 2114.002. CUSTOMER SERVICE INPUT. (a) A state agency shall create an inventory of external customers for each budget strategy listed in the General Appropriations Act for that agency.

(b) Each agency shall gather information from customers using surveys, focus groups, mobile and web applications, or other appropriate methods approved by the Governor's Office of Budget and Policy and the Legislative Budget Board regarding the quality of service delivered by that agency. The information requested shall be as specified by the Governor's Office of Budget and Policy and the Legislative Budget Board and may include evaluations of an agency's:

(1) facilities, including the customer's ability to access that agency, the office location, signs, and cleanliness;

(2) staff, including employee courtesy, friendliness, and knowledgeability, and whether staff members adequately identify themselves to customers by name, including the use of name plates or tags for accountability;

(3) communications, including toll-free telephone access, the average time a customer spends on hold, call transfers, access to a live person, letters, electronic mail, and any applicable text messaging or mobile applications;

(4) Internet site, including the ease of use of the site, mobile access to the site, information on the location of the site and the agency, and information accessible through the site such as a listing of services and programs and whom to contact for further information or to complain;

(5) complaint handling process, including whether it is easy to file a complaint and whether responses are timely;

(6) ability to timely serve its customers, including the amount of time a customer waits for service in person, by phone, by letter, or at a website; and

(7) brochures or other printed information, including the accuracy of that information.

(c) Not later than June 1 of each even-numbered year and on request of the Legislative Budget Board or the Governor's Office of Budget and Policy, an agency shall report on the information gathered under Subsection (b) to the Legislative Budget Board and the Governor's Office of Budget and Policy.

(d) Each agency maintains ownership of the information gathered under this section.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Renumbered from Sec. 2113.002 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(70), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 799 (H.B. 2110), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2019.

Sec. 2114.003. PERFORMANCE MEASURES. The Legislative Budget Board and the Governor's Office of Budget and Policy shall jointly develop a standardized method to measure customer service satisfaction and create standardized performance measures for state agencies in this area.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Renumbered from Sec. 2113.003 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(70), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 799 (H.B. 2110), Sec. 2, eff. June 10, 2019.

Sec. 2114.004. INSPECTIONS. The Legislative Budget Board and the Governor's Office of Budget and Planning may inspect a state agency and analyze its customer service performance by sending a customer service evaluator to confidentially pretend to be a customer of that agency.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Renumbered from Sec. 2113.004 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(70), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 2114.005. TEXAS STAR AWARD. (a) The Legislative Budget Board and the Governor's Office of Budget and Planning may award the "Texas Star" to a state agency that provides exemplary customer service based on the performance measures and standards adopted under this chapter.

(b) The board and the office of budget and planning shall conduct an evaluation to determine agencies that may qualify for the Texas Star award. The evaluation shall be conducted under the procedures outlined in Sections 66-68, Article IX, Chapter 1452, Acts of the 75th Legislature, Regular Session, 1997 (the General Appropriations Act).

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Renumbered from Sec. 2113.005 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(70), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 2114.006. CUSTOMER RELATIONS REPRESENTATIVE; COMPACT WITH TEXANS. (a) A state agency shall appoint a customer relations representative.

(b) The representative shall:

(1) coordinate the state agency's customer service performance measurement under this chapter;

(2) gather information and evaluations from the public about an agency's customer service;

(3) respond to customer concerns; and

(4) establish the agency's compact with Texans under Subsection (c).

(c) Each state agency shall create a "Compact With Texans." The compact must be approved by the Governor's Office of Budget and Planning and the Legislative Budget Board. Each Compact With Texans shall set customer service standards and describe customer service principles for that agency and address:

(1) the agency's procedures for responding to public contacts and complaints;

(2) applicable licensing and certification procedures; and

(3) customer waiting time for access and service delivery and responses to complaints.

(d) Each agency that maintains a website shall publish its Compact With Texans on that website.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Renumbered from Sec. 2113.006 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(70), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 2114.007. RULEMAKING AUTHORITY. (a) The Governor's Office of Budget and Planning may adopt rules to implement this chapter.

(b) In developing the rules, the office of budget and planning shall consult with and consider the comments of the Legislative Budget Board.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Renumbered from Sec. 2113.007 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(70), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.